apertium-en-af.af.dix
    <pardef n="doo/d__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>d</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ie</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="voka/al__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>al</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prematu/ur__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ur</l>
	  <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>re</l>
	  <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="klima/at__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>at</l>
	  <r>at<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>te</l>
	  <r>at<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="europe/es__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>es</l>
	  <r>es<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>es<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="weerlo/os__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>os</l>
	  <r>os<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>os<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vokati/ef__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ef</l>
	  <r>ef<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ewe</l>
	  <r>ef<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ra/ar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ar</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>re</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l>rer</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>arder</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>arste</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ho/og__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>og</l>
	  <r>og<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ë</l>
	  <r>og<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ër</l>
	  <r>og<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ogste</l>
	  <r>og<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="skra/al__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>al</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ler</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>alste</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="gro/ot__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ot</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ot</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ter</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>otste</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="min__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>der</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="knap__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>per</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>dste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ou__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>d</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>dste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="verna/am__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>am</l>
	  <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>me</l>
	  <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>mer</l>
	  <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>amste</l>
	  <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="na/as__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>as</l>
	  <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>der</l>
	  <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>aste</l>
	  <r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="jon/g__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>k</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>g</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ger</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>gste</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vroe/g__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>g</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ë</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ëer</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>gste</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="sko/on__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>on</l>
	  <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ne</l>
	  <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ner</l>
	  <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>onste</l>
	  <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="nu/ut__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ut</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>we</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>wer</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>utste</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="absolu/ut__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ut</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>te</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="eensaam"><i>eensaam</i><par n="verna/am__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="raar"><i>ra</i><par n="ra/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="droog"><i>dro</i><par n="ho/og__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="swaar"><i>swaar</i><par n="min__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prematuur"><i>prematu</i><par n="prematu/ur__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="umbilikaal"><i>umbilika</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="heilsaam"><i>heilsa</i><par n="verna/am__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Chinees" r="LR"><p><l>Chine</l><r>Sjine</r></p><par n="europe/es__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Sjinees"><i>Sjine</i><par n="europe/es__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="boomloos"><i>boomlo</i><par n="weerlo/os__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="instrumentaal"><i>instrumenta</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neutraal"><i>neutra</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naturaal"><i>natura</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="feodaal"><i>feoda</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alluviaal"><i>alluvia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bilabiaal"><i>bilabia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diluviaal"><i>diluvia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ekwatoriaal"><i>ekwatoria</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fluviaal"><i>fluvia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="glasiaal"><i>glasia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="interkollegiaal"><i>interkollegia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kollegiaal"><i>kollegia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liniaal"><i>linia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ovariaal"><i>ovaria</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="presidiaal"><i>presidia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sosiaal"><i>sosia</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="normaal"><i>norma</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="internasionaal"><i>internasiona</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="seisoenaal"><i>seisoena</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="attributief"><i>attributi</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lokatief"><i>lokati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eksklusief"><i>eksklusi</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adoptief"><i>adopti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alternatief"><i>alternati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="defensief"><i>defensi</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="destruktief"><i>destrukti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="effektief"><i>effekti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstensief"><i>ekstensi</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="foutief"><i>fouti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="HIV-positief"><i>HIV-positi</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="inchoatief"><i>inchoati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="introspektief"><i>introspekti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kontemplatief"><i>kontemplati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="meditatief"><i>meditati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="optatief"><i>optati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proaktief"><i>proakti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="representatief"><i>representati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="subjektief"><i>subjekti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nuut"><i>nu</i><par n="nu/ut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="absoluut"><i>absolu</i><par n="absolu/ut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="europees"><i>europe</i><par n="europe/es__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kanadees"><i>kanade</i><par n="europe/es__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ou"><i>ou</i><par n="ou__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jong"><i>jon</i><par n="jon/g__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dood"><i>doo</i><par n="doo/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naas"><i>na</i><par n="na/as__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="min"><i>min</i><par n="min__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="groot"><i>gro</i><par n="gro/ot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hoog"><i>ho</i><par n="ho/og__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="knap"><i>knap</i><par n="knap__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vernaam"><i>verna</i><par n="verna/am__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lang"><i>lang</i><par n="min__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skraal"><i>skra</i><par n="skra/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vroeg"><i>vroe</i><par n="vroe/g__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klimaat"><i>klima</i><par n="klima/at__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skoon"><i>sko</i><par n="sko/on__adj"/></e>
